Utah statutes.
17C-2-302.   Blight hearing -- Owners may review evidence of blight.
(1)  In each hearing required under Subsection 17C-2-102(1)(a)(i)(C), the
agency shall:
(a)  permit all evidence of the existence or nonexistence of blight within the
proposed urban renewal project area to be presented; and
(b)  permit each record owner of property located within the proposed urban
renewal project area or the record property owner's representative the
opportunity to:
(i)  examine and cross-examine witnesses providing evidence of the existence
or nonexistence of blight; and
(ii)  present evidence and testimony, including expert testimony, concerning
the existence or nonexistence of blight.
(2)  The agency shall allow record owners of property located within a
proposed urban renewal project area the opportunity, for at least 30 days
before the hearing, to review the evidence of blight compiled by the agency or
by the person or firm conducting the blight study for the agency, including
any expert report.
